Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.400

Consolidation of districts—Composition of board.

After the consolidation, the board of the consolidated district shall consist of the number and shall be appointed in the manner prescribed by this chapter for a district originally formed.

The terms of the members of the district boards of the several districts consolidated who are in office at the time of consolidation shall terminate at the time the consolidation becomes effective.

[ 1957 c 153 s 40.]